Doist Privacy Policy
Last Update: October 11th, 2024
This privacy policy ("
Policy
") informs you of our practices when
handling your Information through the Services (both as defined below).
In this Policy, "
Doist
," "
we
," "
our
" or "
us
"
refers to Doist Inc., a company registered in Delaware with its
registered address located at 251 Little Falls Drive, Wilmington, DE 19808. When you are using Doist Services in your personal capacity, we
are the data controller under the applicable privacy laws, and this
Policy applies.
When you are using Doist Services as a member of an organization that is
a customer of Doist (for example, when accessing a Todoist for teams
workspace that relates to your employer if that employer is a Doist
customer), we are a data processor under the applicable privacy laws,
and that organization is the data controller. In those circumstances,
your organization's privacy policy applies, and you should refer to its
privacy policy for information about its privacy practices. For clarity,
we are not responsible for the privacy practices of third parties.
Please be aware that this Policy does not apply to your activities or
any Information that you disclose to your organization, when that
organization is the data controller.
For the purpose of this Policy, "
Information
" means any
information relating to an identified or identifiable individual. This
includes information you provide or generated when you use: (a) our
apps, including Todoist and Twist (each an "
App
" and collectively
the "
Apps
"); and (b) doist.com and any other dedicated Doist
websites, such as todoist.com and twist.com which link to this policy
("
Website
" and together with the "
Apps
" the
"
Services
"). When you use the Services, you accept and understand
we collect, process, use and store your Information as described in this
Policy.
If you do not agree with this Policy, you must not use any of
the Services. If you change your mind in the future, you must stop using
the Services and you may exercise your rights in relation to your
Information as set out in this Policy.
1. Information we collect
We will collect and use the following Information about you:
Information you provide to us
Registration information
: for example, when you create an
account on the Website, you will be asked to provide your name,
job title, email, VAT ID and a password. For paid services,
including Todoist's Pro and Business plans, or Twist Unlimited,
we also collect your billing address, transaction information,
tax identification number, Stripe identification number, and
invoice address ("
Payment Information
").
Information collected via voluntary activities:
for example,
when you communicate with us via email, or participate in
surveys, we ask you to provide your email address and any
Information you choose to provide to allow us to assist you. The
Information we collect from you varies depending on the survey,
but we typically ask you questions about your interests and
habits, your opinion about different products and services and
what you'd like to be offered in the future. We also collect
your ratings, opinions, preferences, questions, pictures, and
responses associated with that survey.
Careers
. If you decide to apply for a job with us, you may
submit your contact information and your resume online. We will
collect the Information you choose to provide us as part of your
job application, such as your contact information, current
employment information, and other information you choose to
submit with your application and on your resume. We are using a
third-party platform, Workable, to help us store and process the
job applications that we receive.
Information we automatically collect or is generated about you
when you use the Services
Identifiers
, such as your IP address, device ID, and device
information (such as model, brand and operating system).
Geolocation information
, such as your GPS information when
you use the location reminder feature of the Services. Where
required, we will obtain your consent prior to collecting such
Information.
Cookies:
we use cookies and other similar technologies
("
Cookies
") to enhance your experience when using the
Services. For more information about our Cookies policy, see
below
How We Use Cookies and Similar Technologies section.
Information you generate when using the Services:
You may
provide Information as part of your use of the Services,
including any Information you provide when sending messages
through the Services. Also, if you choose to share and
collaborate on a task with your co-workers or friends, we will
collect the email address of your co-workers or friends.
Please make sure you have permission from your co-workers or friends
before sharing Information referring to your co-workers or friends
with us. Additionally, for the use of Twist or Twist Unlimited, please
make sure you have all permissions and rights to upload the
Information required on Twist.
Information regarding your use of the Services
, such as app use
information, interactions with our team, and transaction records.
Information received from third parties.
Information we receive from third party platforms:
when you
register through a third party account (such as Facebook or
Google) or when you connect other apps to our Services (such as
Slack and Dropbox), we receive Information which may include
your username, email address, and profile picture.
Information from platforms our Services relies on
, such as
for transaction information and payment verification.
Children
Our Services are not targeted at children, and we do not knowingly
collect Information from children under the age of 13. If you learn that
a child has provided us with Information in violation of this Policy,
please contact us as indicated below.
2. How we use your personal Information
We use your Information to:
Provide you with the Services.
We will
use your Information to perform our contractual obligation towards you
to allow you to create an account and use the Services. The Information
we process when doing so includes your registration information,
Information you provide to us when using the Services, identifiers,
Information you generate when using the Services, and Information
regarding your use of the Services such as transaction information. We
also use your Information when you activate certain features of the
Services, such as your Geolocation information when you use the location
reminder feature. If you are a user of Todoist's paid plans or Twist
Unlimited, we will use your Payment Information for payment processing
purposes as well as sales tax collection and reporting as required by
law.
Improve and monitor the Services.
It is in our legitimate
interests to improve our Services for our customers. When doing so,
we may collect Information we automatically collect or is generated
about you when you use the Services, as well as non-personal
Information about your device such as device manufacturer, model and
operating system, and the amount of free space on your device.
Provide you with support and to respond to your requests or
complaints.
If you reach out to us for support, we will use your
Information to respond to and resolve your queries and complaints
and facilitate support (e.g. retrieval of a forgotten password).
When doing so, we perform our contractual obligation towards you.
The Information we process when doing so includes your registration
information, your identifiers, and any other information about you
collected via our customer support channels.
Conduct analytics.
It is in our legitimate interests to analyse
the use of, and any other interaction or interest in our Services.
When doing so we will process Information we automatically collect
or is generated about you when you use the Services to create
anonymised and aggregated data regarding your App usage.
Process your job application.
It is in our legitimate interest
to process the Information that you choose to submit when you apply
for a job with us.
Send you newsletters about product news, tips and tricks, daily
productivity reports that may be of interest to you.
We will send
you emails with daily reports, newsletters with product news, and
tips and tricks to use our Services. When doing so, we process your
registration information. Your consent can be withdrawn at any time
by following the unsubscribe mechanism at the bottom of each
communication, or by visiting
todoist.com/unsubscribe
or
twist.com/unsubscribe
, as
applicable.
Prevent fraud, defend Doist against legal claims or disputes,
enforce our terms and to comply with our legal obligations.
It is
in our legitimate interest to protect our interests by (1)
monitoring the use of the Services to detect fraud or any other user
behaviour which prejudices the integrity of our Services, (2) taking
steps to remedy aforementioned fraud and behaviour, (3) defending
ourselves against legal claims or disputes, and (4) enforcing our
terms and policies. When doing so, we will process the Information
relevant in such a case, including Information you provide us,
Information we automatically collect about you, and Information
which is provided to us by third parties.
Conduct surveys and Interviews.
From time to time, we may ask
you to participate in surveys and Interviews we conduct which are in
our legitimate interest because they help us understand our userbase
and improve the Services. If you participate, we process your
registration information and any other Information collected through
the survey questions.
3. How we use cookies and similar technologies
Cookies are small files of letters and numbers that we store on your
browser or the hard drive of your computer. They contain information
that is transferred to your computer's hard drive.
Our Services uses Cookies to collect information about your browsing
activities and to distinguish you from other users of our Services. This
aids your experience when you use our Services and also allows us to
improve the functionality of our Services.
We use the following cookies:
Strictly necessary cookies:
Some cookies are strictly necessary
to make our Services available to you; for example, to perform your
login functionality and for user authentication and security. We
cannot provide you with the Services without this type of cookies.
Functional cookies
: These are used to recognise you when you
return to our Website. This enables us to personalise our content
for you, greet you by name and remember your preferences (for
example, your choice of language or region).
Analytical and advertising cookies
. We also use cookies for
analytics purposes and advertising in order to operate, maintain,
and improve our Services. We use third party analytics providers,
including Google Analytics, to help us understand how users engage
with the Services. Google Analytics uses first-party cookies to
track user interactions which helps show how users use our Services.
This information is used to compile reports and to help us improve
our Services. The reports disclose Website trends without
identifying individual visitors. You can opt out of Google Analytics
without affecting how you visit our Website by going
to
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
or
via Google's Ads settings.
We use the following analytical and advertising cookies:
Cookie
Purpose
Retention
Google Analytics
Analyzing website traffic and user behavior
90 days
Datadog
Monitoring web performance and user experience
Session based
Stripe
Handling payments and pricing/upgrade page
Session based
Zendesk
Loading images and providing support on Help Center
Session based
YouTube
Displaying videos on Help Center pages
Varies
Cloudinary
Loading and optimizing images
Session based
You can block cookies by setting your internet browser to block some or
all cookies. However, if you use your browser settings to block all
cookies (including essential cookies) you may not be able to use our
Services.
Except for essential cookies, all cookies will expire after maximum 2
years.
4. Who we share your personal Information with
We share your Information with selected third parties, including:
Other users
who will see your profile information and any other
information you choose to share with them through the Services.
Vendors and service providers we rely on for the provision of the
Services
, for example:
Cloud service providers
who we rely on for data storage,
including Microsoft Azure and Amazon Web Services who are based in
the U.S.; OpenAI, and Google Cloud.
Customer support solution providers
, who help us manage and
respond to our customer questions and complaints and triage issues. This includes
Zendesk Inc., which is based in the U.S. and which hosts our
customer support function; and
Analytics providers
. We work with a number of analytics,
segmentation and mobile measurement service providers who help us
understand our userbase. This includes Google LLC, which is based in
the U.S. You can learn about Google's practices by going
to
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
,
and opt-out of them by downloading the Google Analytics opt-out
browser add-on, available
at
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Third Parties Service Integrations
. When you connect third-party apps to
the Apps, you authorize us to share designated Information and data created
and/or uploaded by you to our server with these third-party services of your
choice on your behalf. Apps’ use of information received from Google APIs
for its Google Calendar integration adheres to
Google API Services
User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements.
Communications platform providers
, who help us manage and send
newsletters to you in relation to the Services. This includes
SendGrid, Mailgun and MailChimp which are based in the U.S.
Payment processors
, such as Stripe . This payment processor is
responsible for the processing of your Information, and may use your
Information for their own purposes in accordance with their privacy
policies. More information is available
at
https://stripe.com/gb/privacy
for
Stripe.
Law enforcement agencies, public authorities or other judicial
bodies and organisations.
We disclose Information if we are
legally required to do so, or if we have a good faith belief that
such use is reasonably necessary to comply with a legal obligation,
process or request; enforce our terms of service and other
agreements, policies, and standards, including investigation of any
potential violation thereof; detect, prevent or otherwise address
security, fraud or technical issues; or protect the rights, property
or safety of us, our users, a third party or the public as required
or permitted by law (including exchanging information with other
companies and organisations for the purposes of fraud protection).
Change of corporate ownership.
If we are involved in a merger,
acquisition, bankruptcy, reorganisation, partnership, asset sale or
other transaction, we may disclose your Information as part of that
transaction.
Although we have in place security measures to maintain the privacy and
integrity of your Information, the transmission of Information via the
internet is not completely secure. We may also take extra steps to
protect your Information and minimise the Information we process. For
example, when we store your Information, we use AES 256 encryption, and
when we send or receive your Information, it is encrypted with TLS 1.1
or above. Additionally, we are not responsible for how third-party
integration services may collect, use or share the Information you send
from the Apps. Please review the privacy policy of such third-party
integration partners before connecting those services to the Apps.
If you join a Todoist for teams workspace relating to organization that
is a customer of Doist (for example, when joining a Todoist for teams
workspace that relates to your employer if that employer is a Doist
customer), we share Information about you with the organization and
other users who belong to that organization. For example, we share your
name and other basic account information. Your organization is the data
controller of Information in its workspace; please see your
organization's privacy policy for information about its privacy
practices.
5. Where we store your Information
Your Information will be processed by our employees and service
providers in the U.S. If you choose to use our Services from the
European Economic Area ("EEA"), the United Kingdom ("UK") or other
regions of the world with laws governing data collection and use that
may differ from U.S. law, then please note that you are transferring
your Information outside of those regions to the U.S. for storage and
processing. We may transfer Information from the EEA or the UK to the
U.S. and other third countries based on European Commission-approved or
UK Government-approved Standard Contractual Clauses, or otherwise in
accordance with applicable data protection laws. Also, we may transfer
your data from the U.S. to other countries or regions in connection with
storage and processing of data, fulfilling your requests, and operating
our Services. You can contact us as detailed below if you want more
information about our data transfer practices.
6. How long we store your Information
Your Information is kept for as long as necessary to achieve the
purposes set out above. When we process Information for our own
purposes, we determine the retention period taking into account various
criteria, such as the type of Services provided to you, the nature and
length of our relationship with you, possible re-enrollment with our
Services, the impact on the Services we provide to you if we delete some
Information from or about you, and mandatory retention periods provided
by law and the statute of limitations. Generally, we also delete your
Information following a valid erasure request (see below Your Rights:
Erasure section).
Some Information we collect will be stored for longer where we have an
overriding legitimate interest to retain such Information (for example,
Information on suspicious behaviour of certain users of our Services and
transaction records).
When deleting Information, we will take measures to make the Information
irrecoverable or irreproducible, and electronic files which contain
Information will be deleted permanently.
7. Your rights
If you are based in the EEA or the UK, you have certain rights in
relation to your Information. You will find more information below on
when which rights can apply. To exercise your rights, please contact us
at
https://www.todoist.com/contact
.
Before fulfilling your request, we may ask you to provide reasonable
Information to verify your identity. Please note that there are
exceptions and limitations to each of these rights, and that while any
changes you make will be reflected in active user databases instantly or
within a reasonable period of time, we may retain Information for
backups, archiving, prevention of fraud and abuse, analytics,
satisfaction of legal obligations, or where we otherwise reasonably
believe that we have a legitimate reason to do so.
Access.
You have the right to access Information, and to receive
an explanation of how we use it and who we share it with. We provide
full access to your Information via our API here:
https://developer.todoist.com/
https://developer.twist.com/
Please note that payment information and integrations are not available
via our API. In the case you want to obtain this information, please
contact customer service
at
https://www.todoist.com/contact
or
https://twist.com/contact
,
(depending on which Doist Service product you are using). The right to
access is not absolute. For example, we cannot reveal trade secrets, or
give you Information about other individuals.
Erasure.
You have the right to delete your account and erase
your Information and upon
deleting your account
,
all your Information will be removed from our production systems.
Usually, only an encrypted copy of your Information will remain on
our backup archives for 90 days, although we reserve the right to
retain some of your Information where there are valid grounds for us
to do so under data protection laws. For example, for the defence of
legal claims, respect freedom of expression, or where we have an
overriding legitimate interest to do so.
Note that where the Information is held by a third party data
controller, such as a payment processor, we will use reasonable steps
to inform them of your request, but we recommend you contact them
directly in accordance with their own privacy policies to ensure your
personal data is erased.
Objection.
You may have the right to object to our processing of
you Information. This is the case where we process such Information
on the basis of our legitimate interests (see above under
How we use your personal information
section),
or where the Information is used for direct marketing purposes. You
may exercise this right as follows:
To stop receiving marketing newsletters: You may withdraw your
consent through the unsubscribe mechanism at the bottom of each
communication.
To stop our cookies being placed for either advertising or analytics
purposes: please change your device or browser settings.
To object to all other processing based on our legitimate interests,
please contact us
at
https://www.todoist.com/contact
. Please
note that we may have an overriding legitimate interest to keep
processing your Information, but we will let you know where this is
the case.
Other rights
You also have the following rights:
Portability.
You have the right to receive a copy of Information
we process on the basis of consent or contract in a structured,
commonly used and machine-readable format, or to request that such
Information is transferred to a third party.
Correction
. You have the right to correct any Information held
about you that is inaccurate.
Restriction
. You have a right in certain circumstances to stop
us processing Information other than for storage purposes.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority
in your country of residence, place of work or where an incident
took place.
8. Contact & complaints
We welcome questions, comments and requests regarding this Policy. For
additional details and frequently asked questions about our policies,
please read our
Security, Privacy and GDPR FAQs
.
If you wish to make a complaint about how we process your
Information
, please contact us
at
https://www.todoist.com/contact
and
we will endeavour to deal with your complaint as soon as possible. You
can also send an email to us
at
privacy@doist.com
.
Alternatively, if you are based in the EEA or the UK, you can send an
email to our EU representative, DataRep
at
doist@datarep.com
or by
filling out
this
form
.
9. Changes
If we make any material changes to this Policy, we will post the updated
Policy here and notify our users through the Services and/or
newsletters. Please check this page frequently to see any updates or
changes to this Policy.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Many websites and apps use Google services to improve their content and keep it free. When they integrate our services, these sites and apps share information with Google.
For example, when you visit a website that uses advertising services like AdSense, including analytics tools like Google Analytics, or embeds video content from YouTube, your web browser automatically sends certain information to Google. This includes the URL of the page you’re visiting and your IP address. We may use the IP address, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also
set cookies on your browser
or read cookies that are already there. Apps that use Google advertising services also share information with Google, such as the name of the app and a unique identifier for advertising.
Google uses the information shared by sites and apps to deliver our services, maintain and improve them, develop new services, measure the effectiveness of advertising, protect against fraud and abuse, and personalize content and ads you see on Google and on our partners’ sites and apps. See our
Privacy Policy
to learn more about how we process data for each of these purposes and our
Advertising
page for more about Google ads, how your information is used in the context of advertising, and how long Google stores this information.
Our
Privacy Policy
explains the legal grounds Google relies upon to process your information — for example, we may process your information with your consent or to pursue legitimate interests such as providing, maintaining and improving our services to meet the needs of our users.
Sometimes, when processing information shared with us by sites and apps, those sites and apps will ask for your consent before allowing Google to process your information. For example, a banner may appear on a site asking for consent for Google to process the information that site collects. When that happens, we will respect the purposes described in the consent you give to the site or app, rather than the legal grounds described in the Google Privacy Policy. If you want to change or withdraw your consent, you should visit the site or app in question to do so.
Ad personalization
If ad personalization is turned on, Google will use your information to make your ads more useful for you. For example, a website that sells mountain bikes might use Google's ad services. After you visit that site, you could see an ad for mountain bikes on a different site that shows ads served by Google.
If ad personalization is off, Google will not collect or use your information to create an ad profile or personalize the ads Google shows to you. You will still see ads, but they may not be as useful. Ads may still be based on the topic of the website or app you're looking at, your current search terms, or on your general location, but not on your interests, search history, or browsing history. Your information can still be used for the other purposes mentioned above, such as to measure the effectiveness of advertising and protect against fraud and abuse.
When you interact with a website or app that uses Google services, you may be asked to choose whether you want to see personalized ads from ad providers, including Google. Regardless of your choice, Google will not personalize the ads you see if your ad personalization setting is off or your account is ineligible for personalized ads.
You can see and control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your
ad settings
.
How you can control the information collected by Google on these sites and apps
Here are some of the ways you can control the information that is shared by your device when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services:
Ad Settings
helps you control ads you see on Google services (such as Google Search or YouTube), or on non-Google websites and apps that use Google ad services. You can also
learn how
ads are personalized, opt out of ad personalization, and block specific advertisers.
If you are signed in to your Google Account, and depending on your Account settings,
My Activity
allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, including the information we collect from the sites and apps you have visited. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Many websites and apps use Google Analytics to understand how visitors engage with their sites or apps. If you don’t want Analytics to be used in your browser, you can
install the Google Analytics browser add-on
. Learn more about
Google Analytics and privacy
.
Incognito mode in Chrome
allows you to browse the web without recording webpages and files in your browser or Account history (unless you choose to sign in). Cookies are deleted after you've closed all of your incognito windows and tabs, and your bookmarks and settings are stored until you delete them. Learn more about
cookies
. Using Incognito mode in Chrome or other private browsing modes does not prevent the collection of data when you visit websites that use Google services, and Google may still collect data when you visit websites using these browsers.
Many browsers, including Chrome, allow you to block third-party cookies. You can also clear any existing cookies from within your browser. Learn more about
managing cookies in Chrome
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 1
https://stripe.com/gb/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connect
Platform Agreement
Account Agreement
Products and Programmes
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe Customer Portal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Radar
Stripe Rewards
Stripe Verifications
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal Purchase Terms
Terminal Reseller Terms
Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Treasury - Connected Accounts
Stripe Treasury - Platforms
Stripe Vault and Forward
Financial Services Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Payment Method Terms
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Data Privacy Framework
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Licences
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.todoist.com/help/articles/360000814029:
Get Started
Guides
Download the Apps
Account Basics
Account Settings
Tips & Tricks
Features
Product Updates
Tasks & Planning
Projects & Sections
Filters & Labels
Comments & Files
Reminders & Notifications
Productivity & Karma
Android & iOS Features
Teams
Guides
FAQ
Security
Billing
Subscriptions
Discounted Pricing
Billing Questions
Troubleshooting
General
Apps
Browsers
Integrations
Known Issues
Syncing
FAQ
Integrations
Automation
Browsers
Calendars
Communication
Email
File Management
Planning
Productivity
Time Tracking
Todoist Help
Zendesk Documentation
Articles
Log in
Contact us
Scheduled maintenance planned from 09:00 to 09:15 AM UTC on Saturday, March 15th. We apologize in advance for the inconvenience! More information on our
status page
.
Get Started
Account Basics
Todoist security, privacy, and compliance
Table of Contents
Instructions
Security
Privacy
Compliance
Get in touch
Last updated by
Pierre
March 13, 2025
In this article, we aim to answer all your questions about how we handle your personal information, the security measures we implement, and our compliance with global regulations like the GDPR.
Check out our comprehensive
Privacy Policy
and
Security Policy
which outlines the measures we take to protect your information in greater detail.
Security
Security refers to the measures and protocols we implement to protect your data from unauthorized access, breaches, and other threats. It encompasses the technical and procedural safeguards we put in place to ensure that your data remains confidential, integral, and available.
How is personal data protected?
We restrict staff access to personal data to a very small number of employees who need access for specific reasons to improve Todoist and Twist.
We regularly test, assess and evaluate the effectiveness of our processes and technology.
We use encryption to safeguard data.
How is personal data encrypted?
When user data is stored in servers and databases, Doist uses AES 256 encryption. When the data is being sent or received, it is encrypted with TLS 1.1 or above. Data backups on our servers are encrypted with AES256 and signed by RSA with 2048 key length.
Additionally, Todoist creates automatic backups within the app on a daily basis for Pro and Business users. We take the necessary safeguards to ensure that these are well protected by maintaining a security system that prevents unauthorized access.
Since GDPR has various requirements, your compliance needs will depend on your precise circumstances. If you have specific questions or needs, please
contact us
.
Who owns my data in Todoist?
When using Todoist on an individual plan under a default
personal workspace
, Doist is considered a Data Processor which means that we control how your user data is processed and are responsible for the data to be processed within GDPR. By using our service, you grant Doist the right to share your content with other authorized users within the context of our collaboration features and functionalities.
By sharing your content with other Todoist users (including in team workspaces or in shared projects within a personal workspace), you grant each of those users the right to access your content through our service, and to use, reproduce, distribute, display, edit, perform, and otherwise interact with such content. When you create or join a
team workspace
(which in this case is considered organizational), you agree to comply with the policies of the applicable organization and any agreement between you and that organization. It means the organization is the owner of all user content in the respective workspace. All user content in the organizational workspace may be shared with the organization and may be modified, deleted, or accessed by the organization. The organization may terminate your access to the organizational workspace at any time and you may not be able to access your content in that workspace. By transferring any content to the organizational workspace, you grant the organization broad rights to your user content.
How can I access and export my personal data?
We provide full access to data via our API, allowing you to obtain the personal data that was provided to us and/or transfer it to another controller. You can find our API for Twist and Todoist here:
https://developer.todoist.com/sync/v7/#getting-started
https://developer.twistapp.com/v2/
Please note that payment information and integrations are not available via our API. In case you want to obtain this information or if you need help exporting your data,
get in touch
.
How is my content protected? Can your employees read my content?
User content, such as tasks and comments, resides in our data stores, which get shielded from internet traffic, and have a strict access policy inside the company.
Access to it is audited, requires multiple layers of authentication, and is only allowed for a valid business purpose. In other words, there's no way for any entitled internal employee to access it without others knowing. The need to access user content is rare.
Are the deleted tasks also deleted from your servers?
Yes, after a while. The system first marks records as deleted before actually deleting them. Soft deletions ensure content is inaccessible by client applications. Hard deletions occur later, deferred in time. The system's behavior supports our multi-device synchronization mechanisms. Records marked as deleted help synchronization algorithms to perform data state conflict resolution.
User content is also present in database backups. They exist for business continuity, in case we ever face a disastrous scenario of data loss, a long period of data unavailability, or data corruption. All data, including backups, are kept encrypted at rest. To date, we have never needed to use database backups.
Database backups do not allow access to each user's data. Instead, we can restore them into a live database, where regular data access controls apply. The backups are rotated automatically and won't last more than 94 days.
Privacy
Privacy refers to how we collect, use, share, and manage your personal data. It involves ensuring that your personal information is used in a way that respects your rights and expectations.
Why do you collect personal data?
The data we collect is required for us to provide you with our services and is used to improve Twist and Todoist.
What types of personal data do you collect?
When registering for Todoist and/or Twist you voluntarily give us information such as your name and email address. You can access and update this information at any time in your personal Account Settings.
In addition, when you use our services, you give us consent to use the following data:
Email
IP address
Device ID
Name and surname (optional, not processed)
Job (optional, not processed)
Phone number (optional, not processed)
VAT ID (optional)
Invoice address (for Pro and Business accounts)
How can I access and export my personal data?
To have your personal data exported, please
contact us
.
We provide full access to data via our API, allowing you to obtain the personal data that was provided to us and/or transfer it to another controller. You can find our API for Twist and Todoist here:
https://developer.todoist.com/sync/v7/#getting-started
https://developer.twistapp.com/v2/
Note that payment information and integrations are not available via our API. In case you want to obtain this information,
get in touch
.
Do you sell any data?
No, we never sell data.
Do you store any personal data once I've deleted my account?
Upon
deleting your account
, all your personal data will be removed from our production systems. Only an encrypted copy of your data will remain on our backup archives for 90 days. After this period, all data associated with your account will be deleted permanently. Please note that we don't provide the encrypted copy from our backup archives upon request.
What cookies do you use?
We use cookies to collect information about your browsing activities and to distinguish you from other Todoist users. This aids your experience when using our app as well as allows us to improve its functionality.
We use the following cookies:
Strictly necessary
cookies: required to perform your login functionality, user authentication, and security;
Functional
cookies: used to recognize you when you return to our website and personalize our content for you, greet you by name, and remember your preference;
Analytical and advertising
cookies: used to help us understand how users engage with our product. We use a handful of third-party cookies: Google Analytics (analyzing website traffic and user behavior), Datadog (monitoring web performance and user experience), Stripe (handling payments and pricing/upgrade page), Zendesk (loading images and providing support or Help Center), YouTube (displaying videos on Help Center pages), Cloudinary (loading and optimizing images).
Do you use third-party services to process data?
We use GDPR-compliant third-party services and hosting partners such as Stripe, AWS, and Google Workspace. In these cases, we take the necessary safeguards to ensure that we are GDPR compliant when sending and receiving data from a third party. Check out Todoist’s security and privacy policies and Twist’s security and privacy policies for more information.
Which third-party services do you use?
For an overview of the third-party services we use and their purpose, please refer to our
list of sub-processors
.
Do you process any data outside the EU?
Yes, we do. We process data in North Virginia, USA using Amazon Web Services (AWS). We only collect as little data as possible, and all data is encrypted using AES 256 encryption.
Compliance
Compliance refers to our adherence to laws, regulations, and standards that govern how we handle your data. It ensures that our practices align with legal and regulatory requirements to protect your rights as a user. Compliance involves demonstrating that we follow these rules and can be held accountable for maintaining them.
GDPR
At Doist, we're fully compliant as of May 25th, 2018. The
General Data Protection Regulation
(GDPR) is a regulation designed to help citizens and residents of the European Union (EU) protect their personal data by specifying how such data may be collected, processed, and stored.
Are our customers able to use Todoist without risking a breach of the GDPR?
Yes, from our end. Of course, if your customers are in a location where the GDPR applies, they need to make sure their business operation is compliant with the GDPR in its own right.
Do you offer a Data Processing Agreement (DPA)?
Yes, we offer a DPA that's pre-signed on behalf of Doist. It can be completed by filling out your details and signing it
here
.
SOC 2 and HIPAA
Currently, we have not yet pursued a SOC2 or HIPAA certification. That said, we’d love to learn more about any compliance certifications you and your team require to adopt Todoist.
Let us know
!
Get in touch
Do you have any unanswered questions?
Get in touch
. We —
Pierre, Marco, Diane, or another one of our 14 teammates — are happy to answer them!